utilities/dictionaries/ltg_LTG-Latgalian.dic
aizbludavuot/HLN370-
aizčyvynuot/HLN37-
aizdoncuot/HLN370-
aizdzīduot/HLN370-
aizgrabynuot/HLN370-
aizkaitavuot/HLN370-
aizkleikuot/HLN370-
aizkurynuot/HLN370-
aizlēkt/0HLN37-
aizmaidzeit/ILN470-
aiznosuot/HLN370-
aizpūguot/HLN370-
aizryugt/0FLN18-
aizsaut/0FLN17-
aizsliduot/HLN370-
aizstateit/ILN470-
aizšliucynuot/HLN370-
aizvainuot/HLN370-
aizvolkuot/HLN370-
aizžvūrgt/0HLN38-
apbroduot/HLN370-
apčuruot/HLN370-
apdrūsynuot/HLN370-
apdzirdeit/ILN470-
apgiut/0FLN17-
apgulēt/ILN470-
apkiupynuot/HLN37-
apkopuot/HLN370-
aplaidynuot/HLN370-
aplēkt/0HLN37-
apmaluot/HLN370-
apmyurēt/HLN370-
appeipuot/HLN370-
appūguot/HLN370-
aprymdynuot/HLN370-
apsakņuot/HLN370-
apskaidruot/HLN370-
apsmaļsteit/ILN470-
apstyprynuot/HLN370-
apsveicynuot/HLN37-
apštukuot/HLN370-
apveilēt/HLN370-
apvolkuot/HLN370-
apžvūrgt/0HLN38-
atbyzuot/HLN37-
atbrist/0HLN37-
atčubynuot/HLN370-
atdrebēt/ILN470-
atdzimt/0HLN37-
atglobuot/HLN370-
atgūļuot/HLN37-
atkitynuot/HLN370-
atknuobuot/HLN37-
atkuortuot/HLN370-
atleit/0FLN17-
atļustynuot/HLN370-
atmērcēt/HLN370-
atnosuot/HLN370-
atpļuopuot/HLN370-
atraut/0FLN17-
atryukt/0HLN38-
atsaldēt/HLN370-
atsyukt/0HLN38-
atsliduot/HLN370-
atstaiguot/HLN370-
atsvaideit/ILN470-
atšķeterēt/HLN370-
attīsuot/HLN370-
atvaicuot/HLN370-
atviļkt/0HLN37-
atvuokt/0HLN38-
atžvūrgt/0HLN38-
daauklēt/HLN370-
dabraukalēt/HLN370-
dačubynuot/HLN370-
dadūrt/0HLN38-
daglobuot/HLN370-
dajaukt/0HLN38-
daklabynuot/HLN370-
dakopuot/HLN370-
dalaksteit/ILN470-
damaidzeit/ILN470-
damyurēt/HLN370-
daplyukuot/HLN370-
daraksteit/ILN47-
daryusēt/HLN370-
dasaut/0FLN17-
daskuobēt/HLN370-
dastateit/ILN470-
dasvylynuot/HLN37-
datikt/0HLN37-
daveilēt/HLN370-
davītuot/HLN370-
dyukt/HLN38-
izacīmuot/HLN37-
izbaruot/HLN370-
izbraukalēt/HLN370-
izbučuot/HLN370-
izdabuot/HLN370-
izdunguot/HLN370-
izgaisynuot/HLN370-
izgrauduot/HLN370-
izjuodelēt/HLN370-
izklabynuot/HLN370-
izkomuot/HLN370-
izkustynuot/HLN370-
izleidzynuot/HLN370-
izlītuot/HLN370-
izmauduot/HLN370-
izmērcēt/HLN370-
iznosuot/HLN370-
izpļuopuot/HLN370-
izraut/0FLN17-
izrunuot/HLN370-
izsaut/0FLN17-
izskoluot/HLN370-
izsmydzynuot/HLN370-
izstreipuot/HLN37-
izšaravuot/HLN370-
izšņaukt/0HLN38-
iztīsuot/HLN370-
izvelēt/HLN370-
izvītuot/HLN370-
izzeimuot/HLN370-
īaudzynuot/HLN370-
ībraukalēt/HLN370-
īčyvynuot/HLN37-
īdoncuot/HLN370-
īdzeivuot/HLN370-
īgauduot/HLN370-
īgruobuot/HLN370-
īkaiseit/ILN470-
īkleikuot/HLN370-
īkraut/0FLN17-
īkvālynuot/HLN370-
īliduot/HLN370-
īmauduot/HLN370-
īmyrguot/HLN370-
īparkuot/HLN370-
īprīcynuot/HLN370-
īraut/0FLN17-
īruodeit/ILN470-
īsaukt/0HLN38-
īskanēt/ILN470-
īsmydzynuot/HLN370-
īstigt/0HLN37-
īšņuokt/0HLN38-
īvylynuot/HLN370-
klīgt/HLN38-
lyugt/HLN38-
nukaitavuot/HLN370-
nūbroduot/HLN370-
nūdarbynuot/HLN370-
nūdzyrdynuot/HLN37-
nūgruobuot/HLN370-
nūklenčuot/HLN370-
nūkvīkt/0HLN38-
nūluncynuot/HLN370-
nūmērcēt/HLN370-
nūpļaut/0FLN17-
nūrymdynuot/HLN370-
nūsašausmynuot/HLN37-
nūsliepuot/HLN370-
nūstruoduot/HLN370-
nūšņuokt/0HLN38-
nūveiduot/HLN370-
nūvuorguot/HLN370-
pabaruot/HLN370-
paceļuot/HLN37-
padunēt/ILN470-
pagaršuot/HLN370-
pajuodelēt/HLN370-
pakraut/0FLN17-
paleiguot/HLN370-
paļustynuot/HLN370-
pamozynuot/HLN370-
papraseit/ILN470-
paryukuot/HLN370-
pasyukt/0HLN38-
pasnigt/0HLN37-
pasveicynuot/HLN37-
patāluot/HLN370-
pavelēt/HLN370-
pažabravuot/HLN37-
pībūrt/0HLN38-
pīdzyrdynuot/HLN37-
pījiugt/0HLN38-
pīkvīkt/0HLN38-
pīluopeit/ILN470-
pīplacynuot/HLN370-
pīrevēt/HLN370-
pīsaut/0FLN17-
pīsnigt/0HLN37-
pīšliucynuot/HLN370-
pīvyzynuot/HLN370-
puorbyrdynuot/HLN370-
puordabuot/HLN370-
puorgraizeit/ILN470-
puorkruokt/0HLN38-
puorlobuot/HLN370-
puormīgt/0HLN38-
puorriekinuot/HLN370-
puorsēdēt/ILN470-
puorstaiguot/HLN370-
puoršliucynuot/HLN370-
puorvoduot/HLN370-
saauklēt/HLN370-
sabūrtuot/HLN370-
sadrebēt/ILN470-
saecēt/HLN370-
sagulēt/ILN470-
saklauseit/ILN470-
sakūrt/0HLN38-
salyugt/0HLN38-
samauruot/HLN370-
samulsynuot/HLN370-
sapuškuot/HLN370-
saryukuot/HLN370-
sasādynuot/HLN370-
sasmaļsteit/ILN470-
sasuopēt/ILN470-
satierguot/HLN370-
saveilēt/HLN370-
savuovuļuot/HLN370-
šļyukt/HLN38-
